apertium-lat.lat.lexc
LEXICON INDICATIVE-PRES3-PASS

%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:or # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eris # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:itur # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:imur # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:imini # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:untur # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-IMPF3

%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ebam # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ebas # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:ebat # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:ebamus # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:ebatis # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ebant # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-IMPF3-PASS

%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ebar # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ebaris # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:ebatur # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:ebamur # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:ebamini # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ebantur # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-FUTR3

%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:am # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:es # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:et # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:emus # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:etis # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ent # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-FUTR3-PASS

%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ar # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eris # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:etur # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:emur # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:emini # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:entur # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PRES3 

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:am # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:as # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:at # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:amus # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:atis # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ant # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PRES3-PASS

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ar # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:aris # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:atur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:amur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:amini # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:antur # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF3 

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:erem # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:eres # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:eret # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:eremus # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:eretis # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:erent # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF3-PASS

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:erer # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ereris # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:eretur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:eremur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:eremini # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:erentur # ;

LEXICON IMPERATIVE-PRESENT3

%<imp%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>: e # ;
%<imp%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>: ite # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! THIRD CONJUGATION i.e. lego/is/lexi/itum/ere !!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CONJ4

%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PRES4 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-PRES4-PASS ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-IMPF4 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-IMPF4-PASS ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-FUTR4 ;
%<v%>: INDICATIVE-FUTR4-PASS ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PRES4 ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-PRES4-PASS ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF4 ;
%<v%>: CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF4-PASS ;
%<v%>: IMPERATIVE-PRESENT4 ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-PRES4

%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:io # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:is # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:it # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:imus # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:itis # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:iunt # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-PRES4-PASS

%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:ior # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:iris # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:itur # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:imur # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:imini # ;
%<ind%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:iuntur # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-IMPF4

%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:iebam # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:iebas # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:iebat # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:iebamus # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:iebatis # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:iebant # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-IMPF4-PASS

%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:iebar # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:iebaris # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:iebatur # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:iebamur # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:iebamini # ;
%<ind%>%<impf%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:iebantur # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-FUTR4

%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:iam # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ies # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:iet # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:iemus # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:ietis # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ient # ;

LEXICON INDICATIVE-FUTR4-PASS

%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:iar # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ieris # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:ietur # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:iemur # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:iemini # ;
%<ind%>%<fut%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:ientur # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PRES4 

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:iam # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ias # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:iat # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:iamus # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:iatis # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:iant # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-PRES4-PASS

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:iar # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:iaris # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:iatur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:iamur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:iamini # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:iantur # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF4 

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:irem # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ires # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:iret # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:iremus # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:iretis # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:irent # ;

LEXICON CONGIUNTIVE-IMPF4-PASS

%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:irer # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ireris # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:iretur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:iremur # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:iremini # ;
%<cong%>%<pres%>%<pass%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:irentur # ;

LEXICON IMPERATIVE-PRESENT4

%<imp%>%<pres%>%<sg%>%<p2%>: i # ;
%<imp%>%<pres%>%<pl%>%<p2%>: ite # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! ESSE CONJUGATION i.e. sum/es/fui/esse !!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!



LEXICON Nouns

rosa:ros CASE1 ; ! "rose"
Athenae:Athen CASE1-PL-TANT ; ! "Athens"
sapientia:sapienti CASE1-SG-TANT ; ! "knowledge" ?
eloquentia:eloquenti CASE1-SG-TANT ; ! "eloquence"
prudentia:prudenti CASE1-SG-TANT ; ! "prudence"
abundantia:abundanti CASE1-SG-TANT ; ! "abundance"
scientia:scienti CASE1-SG-TANT ; ! "science"


LEXICON Adjectives 

bonus:bon ADJ-CLASS1 ; ! "good"

LEXICON Verbs 

esse:esse NOV ; ! "to be"

laudo:laud CONJ1 ; ! "to praise"
laudo:laudav REGULAR-PERFECT ;
moneo:mon CONJ2 ; ! "to warn"
moneo:monu REGULAR-PERFECT ;
lego:leg CONJ3 ; 
audio:aud CONJ4 ;  ! "i hear"
